Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 5
BONDED INDEBTEDNESS

23-71-501. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board of trustees" means the governing body authorized by law to administer the affairs of any local college district.

"District" means a local college district organized and existing pursuant to law.

(2.5) "Eligible elector" means an elector who has complied with the registration provisions of article 2 of title 1, C.R.S., and who resides within the local college district calling the election.

"Net effective interest rate" of a proposed issue of bonds means the net interest cost of the issue divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of such issue maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from the date of said proposed bonds to their respective maturities. In all cases, the net effective interest rate shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the bonds.

"Net interest cost" of a proposed issue of bonds means the total amount of interest to accrue on said bonds from their date to their respective maturities, plus the amount of any discount below par or less the amount of any premium above par at which said bonds are being or have been sold. In all cases the net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the bonds.

and (6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 860, § 72, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 767, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 860, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2.5) added and (5) and (6) amended, p. 860, § 72, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-502. Bonded indebtedness - elections.

No general obligation bonded indebtedness shall be contracted by any district for the purpose of purchasing, erecting, improving, remodeling, and furnishing local district college buildings, sites, facilities, and equipment unless the proposition to create such debt has first been submitted to and approved by the eligible electors of the district.

The board of trustees of any district, at any regular biennial school election or at a special election called for the purpose, shall submit to the eligible electors of the district the question of contracting a bonded indebtedness for the purpose of purchasing, erecting, improving, remodeling, and furnishing local district college buildings, sites, facilities, and equipment, which purposes shall be broadly construed, subject to the limitations provided in section 23-71-503.

All elections authorized under this article shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. The secretary of the board of trustees shall be the designated election official for all elections unless otherwise provided by the board of trustees. Any notice given shall contain a statement of the amount of the bonded indebtedness proposed to be contracted, the maximum net effective interest rate at which the indebtedness shall be incurred, and the maximum period of time within which the amount shall be payable, and the day and the place of the election.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 861, § 73, effective January 1, 1993.)

The board of trustees of any district, having received approval at an election to issue bonds and having determined that the limitations of the original election question are too restrictive to permit the advantageous sale of the bonds so authorized, may submit at another regular or special election:

The question of issuing the bonds, or any portion thereof, at a higher maximum net effective interest rate than the maximum interest rate or maximum net effective interest rate approved at the original election; or

The question of issuing the bonds, or any portion thereof, to mature over a longer period of time than the maximum period of maturity approved at the original election.

An election held pursuant to this subsection (6) shall be held in substantially the same manner as an election to authorize bonds initially, except as may be required for the submission of the limited question permitted under this subsection (6).

If a majority of those voting at an election held pursuant to this subsection (6) fail to approve the changes submitted, such result shall not impair the authority of the board of trustees at a later time to issue the bonds originally approved within the limitations established at the first election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 767, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(2) to (5), IP(6)(a), and (6)(c) amended, p. 860, § 42, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) to (5) amended, p. 861, § 73, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-503. Limitations on elections.

The question of contracting bonded indebtedness may be submitted or resubmitted after the same or any other such question has previously been rejected at an election held pursuant to this part 5; but no such question shall be submitted or resubmitted at any election held less than one hundred twenty days after a previous submission of such question, and the board of trustees of a district shall not submit any question of contracting bonded indebtedness at more than two elections within any twelve-month period. The provisions of this section shall not apply to elections on assumption of existing bonded indebtedness held pursuant to law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 768, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 861, § 43, effective July 1.

23-71-504. Limit of bonded indebtedness.

Each district shall have a limit of bonded indebtedness of twenty percent of the latest valuation for assessment of the taxable property in such district as certified by the assessor to the board of county commissioners. The indebtedness of the former districts or parts of districts, constituting any new district, shall not be considered in fixing the limit of such twenty percent; but, if any district assumes the bonded indebtedness of any other district, or a proportionate share thereof, existing at the time of inclusion in the assuming district, pursuant to law, such bonded indebtedness shall be included in the twenty percent limitation.

The permission to incur additional bonded indebtedness, granted by the property tax administrator in the department of local affairs, and any district bonds issued pursuant thereto on or after May 10, 1972, are hereby validated. This subsection (2) shall not be construed to grant authority to incur bonded indebtedness in excess of said twenty percent limitation.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-505. Voting precincts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 861, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 862, § 74, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-506. Ballots. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 862, § 45, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 862, § 75, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-507. Joint election for directors and bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 862, § 76, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section repealed, p. 1438, § 131, effective July 1.

23-71-508. Pollbooks - certificate of return. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 769, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 862, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 862, § 77, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-509. Registration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 770, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 863, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 863, § 78, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-510. Registration list omissions - challenges - oath - rejection of vote. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added p. 770, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(4) amended, p. 410, § 12, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 86:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 863, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 863, § 79, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-511. Count and canvass. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 771, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 863, § 49, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 864, § 80, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-512. Absentee voting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 771, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 410, § 13, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 864, § 81, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-513. Use of voting machines. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 771, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 863, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 865, § 82, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-514. Board of trustees may issue bonds - exemption from Colorado income tax.

When approved at an election held pursuant to section 23-71-502, the board of trustees, from time to time, as the proceeds thereof are needed for the purposes specified in the notice of said bond election, shall issue bonds of the district in denominations of one thousand dollars or any multiple of one thousand dollars, in its discretion, bearing interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the bond issue does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate specified in the notice of said bond election, payable at such time, determined in the discretion of the board of trustees, which bonds shall mature serially, commencing not later than five years and extending not more than twenty-five years from the date thereof. Principal and interest thereon shall be payable at such place as shall be determined by said board of trustees and designated in said bonds. Said bonds shall be made callable for redemption commencing no later than eleven years from their date in such manner, with or without premium, as may be determined by the board of trustees. Interest on local college district bonds issued on or after July 1, 1973, shall be exempt from Colorado income tax.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 772, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 863, § 51, effective July 1.

23-71-515. Form of bonds.

The bonds issued under the provisions of this part 5 shall be numbered consecutively, beginning with number one. The board of trustees of the district is authorized to prescribe the form of such bonds. Said bonds shall recite that they are issued pursuant to this part 5, and said bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of trustees, bear an impression of the seal of the district, and be attested by signature of the secretary. Coupons, if any, evidencing the interest thereon shall bear the signature of the president of the board of trustees, which may be affixed by him in person, or it may be an engraved or lithographed facsimile thereof. At the discretion of the board of trustees, any bonds may be issued with privileges for registration of such bonds for payment as to principal, interest, or both. In the execution of bonds authorized pursuant to this part 5, the board of trustees may provide for the use of facsimile signatures and facsimile seals in the manner set forth in article 55 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 772, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 864, § 52, effective July 1.

23-71-516. Sale at less than par - discount.

If it is found to be in the best interest of the district, the board of trustees may issue such bonds and accept therefor less than their face value; but such bonds shall be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate for the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate approved by the voters in the election authorizing such bonds.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 772, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 864, § 53, effective July 1.

23-71-517. Board of trustees to certify needed revenues.

If the board of trustees has issued any of said bonds at the time of certifying to the board of county commissioners a statement showing the amount necessary to raise from the taxable property of said district for the general fund as required by law, it shall also certify to said board of county commissioners the amount needed for its bond redemption fund to pay all installments of principal and interest of said bonds, which, according to their terms, have already become due and payable or shall become due and payable during the next ensuing fiscal year, or both, together with such additional amount, if any, as, in the judgment of the board of trustees, is desirable to raise from the taxable property of said district for the purpose of redeeming, during the said ensuing fiscal year, any of said bonds which are redeemable but not due.

The board of trustees has the authority to include in each amount certified for said bond redemption fund an amount to create a reserve for the redemption of bonds in future years prior to their maturities or for purchasing at a discount and cancellation any bond on which the interest is being paid from the current district debt service mill levy; but said reserve shall be restricted to the subsidiary account in the bond redemption fund for which said tax levy was made. A total of not more than one mill on the then current valuation for assessment may be carried in the reserve at any one time to be available for prior redemption purposes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 772, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 864, § 54, effective July 1.

23-71-518. Tax levy to pay principal and interest.

If any district has issued bonds under the provisions of this part 5, it is the duty of the board of county commissioners of the county in which said district is situated, at the time of levying other district taxes, to levy a tax on all the taxable property of said district at a rate sufficient to produce such amount as has been certified by the board of trustees of said district for the purpose of paying bonds not yet due, as provided in section 23-71-517.

Except when said district has sufficient moneys or securities in a refunding escrow account to satisfy the bonded indebtedness obligations which will be due and payable during said district's next ensuing fiscal year, if the board of trustees fails to certify such an amount to the board of county commissioners as required by section 23-71-517, the board of county commissioners, nevertheless, shall levy upon the appropriate taxable property of said district a tax in addition to the taxes levied for other purposes in an amount sufficient to pay all installments of principal and interest of said bonds that shall become due during the next ensuing fiscal year or, if said bonds do not become due and payable in series at different times, in an amount sufficient to pay all installments of interest then to become due and the aforesaid portion of principal.

The amount certified pursuant to section 23-71-517 and the rate of the tax levy required by this section shall be sufficient to cover any deficiency which may occur by reason of delinquent payment of taxes.

The county treasurer shall not collect any fee on the moneys received by virtue of a tax levied pursuant to this section or by virtue of his office having been designated as the place of payment or optional place of payment for bonds issued under this part 5 or under part 6 of this article, nor shall he collect any fee on any moneys received from any other source to pay bonds or interest thereon.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 773, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 865, § 55, effective July 1.

23-71-519. Bond fund - payment and redemption.

Such taxes shall be collected in the same manner as district taxes and when collected shall be placed by the county treasurer in the bond redemption fund of said district. The moneys in said fund shall be used only for payment of interest upon and for the redemption of such bonds, upon orders signed and countersigned in the manner provided by law for the execution of other district orders; but the board of trustees of said district may withdraw any or all of such moneys credited to said fund which are temporarily not needed to satisfy the obligations of bonded indebtedness, for the purpose of depositing or investing such moneys in the manner prescribed by law.

Redemption of said bonds prior to the respective maturities thereof may be made in either direct or inverse numerical order as determined by the board of trustees in the resolution authorizing the issuance of said bonds and set forth on the face of said bonds. Notice of the redemption of said bonds, prior to maturity, shall be made in the manner prescribed in said bond resolution. In the absence of such prescribed manner in the bond resolution, a redemption prior to maturity shall be made in the following manner: When authorized by the board of trustees, the treasurer of said board shall advertise in some newspaper published in the district once a week for two consecutive weeks that on a certain day, named in said advertisement, not less than four weeks after the time of the first publication thereof, he will redeem certain of said bonds therein described by number, amount, and date of issue thereof and that the principal, interest to redemption date, and redemption premium, if any, of said bonds will be paid in accordance with the bond resolution authorizing such bonds. The notice shall indicate also that, after the day so fixed for redemption, the interest on the bonds shall cease. After the day of redemption so fixed in said notice the bonds so advertised and called to be redeemed shall cease to draw interest.

If the bonds are made payable at the office of the county treasurer, any redemption of such bonds shall also be made at the office of the county treasurer of the county, who shall make a notation of such payment or redemption upon his books.

If the bonds are made payable at some place other than the office of the county treasurer, such bonds shall be redeemable at the place where payable, and the treasurer of the board of trustees shall, immediately after the payment or redemption, inform the county treasurer that certain bonds, describing them by number, amount, and date of issue, have been paid or redeemed and canceled, and said county treasurer shall make a record of such payment or redemption upon his books.

In all cases bonds when paid or redeemed shall be canceled by the treasurer of the board of trustees and preserved by him and his successors for a period of one year after the date of their payment or redemption.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 773, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1), (2), (4), and (5) amended, p. 865, § 56, effective July 1.

23-71-520. Place of payment.

The board of trustees is authorized to designate the office of the county treasurer of the county in which the headquarters of such district is situated as the place of payment or optional place of payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds issued by any such district or to designate any commercial bank or trust company as the place of payment or optional place of payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds issued by any such district, and the commercial bank or trust company so designated may be located either within or without this state.

It is the duty of the board of trustees to cause sufficient moneys from said tax levy or refunding escrow account to be placed from time to time at the place of payment, or optional place of payment, designated on said bonds in an amount to satisfy the principal and interest obligations of said bonds as the same may become due and payable from time to time. It is the duty of the treasurer of said board to pay or cause to be paid the obligations of said bonds as the same may become due and payable, upon presentation of the bonds and coupons respectively evidencing such obligations, from any moneys to the credit of the appropriate account available for that purpose.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 774, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 866, § 57, effective July 1.

23-71-521. Registration of bonds.

When any district issues bonds under the provisions of this part 5, the board of trustees may make and enter in its record a request that the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein the headquarters of such district is situated register the bonds in a book to be kept by him for that purpose. When so registered, the legality thereof shall not be open to contest by such district, or any person whomsoever, for any reason whatever. A certified copy of the order of the board of trustees, so made and entered of record, shall be furnished to the said county clerk and recorder by the said board, and, thereupon, it shall be his duty to register said bonds, noting the name of the district and the amount, the date of issuance and maturity, and the rate of interest of said bonds. He shall receive a fee of twenty-five dollars for registering each such issue.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 774, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 867, § 58, effective July 1.

23-71-522. Changes in boundaries - liability.

Nothing in this part 5 or in any other provision of law shall release the taxable property within a district which incurred bonded indebtedness from liability for its proportionate share of the outstanding obligations thereof.

The taxable property located within the territory of a district which is dissolved shall be liable for its proportionate share of the bonded indebtedness incurred by the district.

The taxable property of a district which is detached and annexed shall be liable for its proportionate share of the bonded indebtedness previously incurred by the annexing district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-523. Validation.

All outstanding bonds and all acts and proceedings had or taken, or purportedly had or taken, prior to July 1, 1964, by or on behalf of any district under law or under color of law preliminary to and in the authorization, execution, sale, issuance, and payment of all such bonds are validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, notwithstanding any lack of power or authority or otherwise, other than constitutional, and notwithstanding any defects and irregularities, other than constitutional, in such bonds, acts, and proceedings and in such authorization, execution, sale, issuance, and payment, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such acts and proceedings appertaining to bonds, all or any part of which have not been issued nor purportedly issued.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-524. Prior obligations not impaired.

Nothing in this part 5 shall impair the obligations of any bonds, or the refunding thereof, issued by a school district prior to July 1, 1964, or otherwise invalidate any such bond or the obligations or refunding thereof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-525. Public disclosure of terms of sale.

When bonds are sold, the board of trustees of the district selling the same shall cause to be prepared and filed with the state board for community colleges and occupational education, within ten days after said sale, a report setting forth a description of the bond issue, the applicable interest rate, including the net effective interest rate, any other terms of the sale, and any applicable statistical, comparative bond market data, ratings, and indices relative to prevailing market conditions prior to and at the time of said sale and explaining the reasons why it was necessary, if it was, that the bonds be sold at a negotiated sale instead of by public competitive bidding. The state board for community colleges and occupational education may request additional information from the district or from the purchaser of the bonds regarding terms of the sale.

One or more copies of said report shall be retained on file at the administrative headquarters of the district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 867, § 59, effective July 1.

23-71-526. Validation.

All elections and all acts and proceedings had or taken, or purportedly had or taken, prior to June 2, 1971, by or on behalf of any district, under law or under color of law, preliminary to and in the holding and canvass of all elections are validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, notwithstanding any lack of power, authority, or otherwise and notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in such elections, acts, and proceedings.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 775, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-527. Validation - effect - limitations.

All bonds issued and other contracts, leases, or agreements executed by districts, all district bond elections held and carried, and all acts and proceedings had or taken prior to July 1, 1973, by or on behalf of such districts, preliminary to and in the authorization, execution, sale, and issuance of all bonds, the authorization and execution of all other contracts, leases, or agreements, and the exercise of other powers in section 23-71-504 are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, notwithstanding any defects and irregularities, other than constitutional, in such bonds, acts, and proceedings, in such authorization, execution, sale, and issuance, and in such exercise of powers; and such bonds and other contracts, leases, or agreements are and shall be binding, legal, valid, and enforceable obligations of the district to which they appertain in accordance with their terms and their authorization proceedings.

This section shall operate to supply such legislative authority as may be necessary to accomplish the validations provided and authorized in this section but shall be limited to validations consistent with all provisions of applicable law in effect at the time of such action or other matter. This article shall not operate to validate any action or other matter the legality of which is being contested or inquired into in any legal proceedings pending and undetermined prior to July 1, 1973, nor to validate any action or other matter which has been determined in any legal proceedings prior to July 1, 1973, to be illegal, void, or ineffective.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 776, § 1, effective July 1.